src/fst/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronouns
!!! Direct
ako+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Dir:akó # ;      ! 1st person singular
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dir:kitá # ;     ! 1st person dual
!versions: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Tagalog_grammar#Pronouns
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Du1+Dir:katá # ;     ! 1st person dual
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Dir:tayo # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Dir:kamí # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dir:ikáw # ;     ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Dir:ka # ;     ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Dir:kayó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Dir:siyá # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dir:silá # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Indirect (Genitive)
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr:ko # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Idr:nakin # ;       ! 1st person singular
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Du1+Idr:nita # ;     ! 1st person dual
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Du1+Idr:nata # ;     ! 1st person dual
ako+v3+Pron+Pers+Du1+Idr:ta # ;     ! 1st person dual
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Idr:natin # ;    ! 1st person inclusive
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Idr:namin # ;    ! 1st person exclusive
ikaw+v1+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr:mo # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+v2+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Idr:niyo # ;       ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Idr:ninyó # ;    ! 2nd person plural
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Idr:niyá # ;     ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Idr:nilá # ;     ! 3rd person plural

 !!! Oblique
ako+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Obl:akin # ;     ! 1st person singular
ako+v1+Pron+Pers+Du1+Obl:kanitá # ;   ! 1st person dual
ako+v2+Pron+Pers+Du1+Obl:kanatá # ;   ! 1st person dual
ako+v3+Pron+Pers+Du1+Obl:atá # ;   ! 1st person dual
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Incl+Obl:atin # ;     ! 1st person inclusive
ako+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Excl+Obl:amin # ;     ! 1st person exclusive
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Obl:iyó # ;      ! 2nd person singular
ikaw+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Obl:inyó # ;     ! 2nd person plural
siya+Pron+Pers+Sg3+Obl:kaniyá # ;   ! 3rd person singular
siya+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Obl:kanilá # ;   ! 3rd person plural
